Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle F. Director’s Conflicts of Interest.

§79-4-8.60.
Definitions.

In Sections 79-4-8.60 through 79-4-8.63 and Section 79-4-8.70:

“Director’s conflicting interest transaction” means a transaction effected or proposed to be effected by the corporation (or by an entity controlled by the corporation):

“Control” (including the term “controlled by”) means (i) having the power, directly or indirectly, to elect or remove a majority of the members of the board of directors or other governing body of an entity, whether through the ownership of voting shares or interests, by contract, or otherwise, or (ii) being subject to a majority of the risk of loss from the entity’s activities or entitled to receive a majority of the entity’s residual returns.

“Relevant time” means (i) the time at which directors’ actions respecting the transaction are taken in compliance with Section 79-4-8.62, or (ii) if the transaction is not brought before the board of directors of the corporation (or its committee) for action under Section 79-4-8.62, at the time the corporation (or an entity controlled by the corporation) becomes legally obligated to consummate the transaction.

“Material financial interest” means a financial interest in a transaction that would reasonably be expected to impair the objectivity of the director’s judgment when participating in action on the authorization of the transaction.

“Related person” means:

“Fair to the corporation” means, for purposes of Section 79-4-8.61(b) (3), that the transaction as a whole was beneficial to the corporation, taking into appropriate account whether it was (i) fair in terms of the director’s dealings with the corporation, and (ii) comparable to what might have been obtainable in an arms’ length transaction, given the consideration paid or received by the corporation.

“Required disclosure” means disclosure of (i) the existence and nature of the director’s conflicting interest, and (ii) all facts known to the director respecting the subject matter of the transaction that a director free of such conflicting interest would reasonably believe to be material in deciding whether to proceed with the transaction.

To which, at the relevant time, the director is a party; or

Respecting which, at the relevant time, the director had knowledge and a material financial interest known to the director; or

Respecting which, at the relevant time, the director knew that a related person was a party or had a material financial interest.

The director’s spouse;

A child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, sibling, stepsiblings, half-siblings, aunt, uncle, niece or nephew (or spouse of any thereof) of the director or of the director’s spouse;

An individual living in the same home as the director;

An entity (other than the corporation or an entity controlled by the corporation) controlled by the director or any person specified in this paragraph (5);

A domestic or foreign (A) business or nonprofit corporation (other than the corporation or an entity controlled by the corporation) of which the director is a director, (B) unincorporated entity of which the director is a general partner or a member of the governing body, or (C) individual, trust or estate for whom or of which the director is a trustee, guardian, personal representative or like fiduciary; or

A person that is, or an entity that is controlled by, an employer of the director.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 538, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 429, § 8; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 25, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

In 2009, a typographical error in paragraph (3) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “(i) the time at which directors’ actions respecting the transaction are taken...” for “(i) the time at which directors’ actions respecting the transaction is taken...” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

The 2006 amendment rewrote the section to revise definitions dealing with a director’s conflicts of interest.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, inserted “stepsiblings, half-siblings, aunt, uncle, niece or nephew” following “sibling” in (5)(ii).

Director’s conflict of interest under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-269.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1500 et seq.

16 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 3d 583, Corporate Director’s Breach of Fiduciary Duty to Creditors.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 870 et seq.

Transactions Between a Corporation and Its Directors: Where Does Mississippi Stand? 52 Miss. L. J. 877.

§79-4-8.61.
When director’s actions not sanctionable.

A transaction effected or proposed to be effected by the corporation or by an entity controlled by the corporation may not be the subject of equitable relief, or give rise to an award of damages or other sanctions against a director of the corporation, in a proceeding by a shareholder or by or in the right of the corporation, on the ground that the director has an interest respecting the transaction, if it is not a director’s conflicting interest transaction.

A director’s conflicting interest transaction may not be the subject of equitable relief, or give rise to an award of damages or other sanctions against a director of the corporation, in a proceeding by a shareholder or by or in the right of the corporation on the ground that the director has an interest respecting the transaction, if:

Directors’ action respecting the transaction was taken in compliance with Section 79-4-8.62 at any time; or

Shareholders’ action respecting the transaction was taken in compliance with Section 79-4-8.63 at any time; or

The transaction, judged according to the circumstances at the relevant time, is established to have been fair to the corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 538, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 320 § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 429, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

The 2006 amendment rewrote the section to clarify when a director’s actions are not sanctionable.

Director’s conflicting interest transaction defined, see § 79-4-8.60.

Effectiveness of director’s action for purposes of § 79-4-8.61, see § 79-4-8.62.

Effectiveness of transaction for purposes of § 79-4-8.61 when shareholders approve, see § 79-4-8.63.

Shareholders’ action respecting a business opportunity taken in compliance with § 79-4-8.63 not sanctionable, see § 79-4-8.70.

Director’s conflict of interest under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-269.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1500 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 870 et seq.

Transactions Between a Corporation and Its Directors: Where Does Mississippi Stand? 52 Miss. L. J. 877.

Robertson, The Law of Corporate Governance: Coming of Age in Mississippi? 65 Miss. L. J. 477.

§79-4-8.62.
Effectiveness of directors’ action; disclosure.

Directors’ action respecting a director’s conflicting interest transaction is effective for purposes of Section 79-4-8.61(b)(1)if the transaction has been authorized by the affirmative vote of a majority (but no fewer than two (2)) of the qualified directors who voted on the transaction, after required disclosure by the conflicted director of information not already known by such qualified directors or after modified disclosure in compliance with subsection (b), provided that:

The qualified directors have deliberated and voted outside the presence of and without the participation by any other director; and

Where the action has been taken by a committee, all members of the committee were qualified directors, and either (i) the committee was composed of all the qualified directors on the board of directors, or (ii) the members of the committee were appointed by the affirmative vote of a majority of the qualified directors on the board.

The nature of the conflicted director’s duty not to disclose the confidential information.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), when a transaction is a director’s conflicting interest transaction only because a related person described in Section 79-4-8.60(5)(v) or (vi) is a party to or has material financial interest in the transaction, the conflicted director is not obligated to make required disclosure to the extent that the director reasonably believes that doing so would violate a duty imposed under law, a legally enforceable obligation of confidentiality, or a professional ethics rule, provided that the conflicted director discloses to the qualified directors voting on the transaction:

All information required to be disclosed that is not so violative;

The existence and nature of the director’s conflicting interest; and

A majority (but no fewer than two (2)) of all the qualified directors on the board of directors, or on the committee, constitutes a quorum for purposes of action that complies with this section.

Where directors’ action under this section does not satisfy a quorum or voting requirement applicable to the authorization of the transaction by reason of the articles of incorporation, the bylaws, or provision of law, independent action to satisfy those authorization requirements must be taken by the board of directors or a committee, in which action directors who are not qualified directors may participate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 538, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 429, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

The 2006 amendment rewrote the section to clarify disclosure required of a director concerning a conflicting interest.

Qualified director defined, see § 79-4-1.43.

Director’s conflicting interest transaction defined, see § 79-4-8.60.

Directors’ action respecting transaction taken in compliance with § 79-4-8.62 not sanctionable, see § 79-4-8.61.

Directors’ action respecting a business opportunity taken in compliance with § 79-4-8.62 not sanctionable, see § 79-4-8.70.

Director’s conflict of interest under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-269.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1500 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 870 et seq.

Transactions Between a Corporation and Its Directors: Where Does Mississippi Stand? 52 Miss. L. J. 877.

§79-4-8.63.
Shareholder approval of director’s conflicting interest transaction.

Shareholders’ action respecting a director’s conflicting interest transaction is effective for purposes of Section 79-4-8.61(b)(2) if a majority of the votes cast by the holders of all qualified shares are in favor of the transaction after (1) notice to shareholders describing the action to be taken respecting the transaction, (2) provision to the corporation of the information referred to in subsection (b), and (3) communication to the shareholders entitled to vote on the transaction of the information that is the subject of required disclosure, to the extent the information is not known by them.

A director who has a conflicting interest respecting the transaction shall, before the shareholders’ vote, inform the secretary or other officer or agent of the corporation authorized to tabulate votes, in writing, of the number of shares that the director knows are not qualified shares under subsection (c), and the identity of the holders of those shares.

For purposes of this section, (1) “holder” means, and “held by” refers to shares held by, both a record shareholder (as defined in Section 79-4-13.01(7)) and a beneficial shareholder (as defined in Section 79-4-13.01(2)); and (2) “qualified shares” means all shares entitled to be voted with respect to the transaction except for shares that the secretary (or other officer or agent of the corporation authorized to tabulate votes) either knows, or under subsection (b) is notified, are held by (A) a director who has a conflicting interest respecting the transaction, or (B) a related person of the director (excluding a person described in Section 79-4-8.60(5)(vi)).

A majority of the votes entitled to be cast by the holders of all qualified shares constitutes a quorum for purposes of compliance with this section. Subject to the provisions of subsection (e), shareholders’ action that otherwise complies with this section is not affected by the presence of holders, or by the voting, of shares that are not qualified shares.

If a shareholders’ vote does not comply with subsection (a) solely because of a director’s failure to comply with subsection (b), and if the director establishes that the failure was not intended to influence and did not in fact determine the outcome of the vote, the court may take such action respecting the transaction and the director, and may give such effect, if any, to the shareholders’ vote, as the court considers appropriate in the circumstances.

Where shareholders’ action under this section does not satisfy a quorum or voting requirement applicable to the authorization of the transaction by reason of the articles of incorporation, the bylaws or a provision of law, independent action to satisfy those authorization requirements must be taken by the shareholders, in which action shares that are not qualified shares may participate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 538, § 4; Laws, 2006, ch. 429, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

The 2006 amendment rewrote the section to revise requirements necessary for shareholder approval of a director’s conflicting interest transaction.

Director’s conflicting interest transaction defined, see § 79-4-8.60.

Shareholders’ action respecting transaction taken in compliance with § 79-4-8.63 as not sanctionable, see § 79-4-8.61.

Director’s conflict of interest under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-269.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1500 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 870 et seq.

Transactions Between a Corporation and Its Directors: Where Does Mississippi Stand? 52 Miss. L. J. 877.

§79-4-8.70.
Business opportunities.

A director’s taking advantage, directly or indirectly, of a business opportunity may not be the subject of equitable relief, or give rise to an award of damages or other sanctions against the director, in a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation on the ground that such opportunity should have first been offered to the corporation, if before becoming legally obligated respecting the opportunity the director brings it to the attention of the corporation and:

Action by qualified directors disclaiming the corporation’s interest in the opportunity is taken in compliance with the procedures set forth in Section 79-4-8.62, as if the decision being made concerned a director’s conflicting interest transaction; or

Shareholders’ action disclaiming the corporation’s interest in the opportunity is taken in compliance with the procedures set forth in Section 79-4-8.63, as if the decision being made concerned a director’s conflicting interest transaction;

except that, rather than making “required disclosure” as defined in Section 79-4-8.60, in each case the director shall have made prior disclosure to those acting on behalf of the corporation of all material facts concerning the business opportunity that are then known to the director.

In any proceeding seeking equitable relief or other remedies based upon an alleged improper taking advantage of a business opportunity by a director, the fact that the director did not employ the procedure described in subsection (a) before taking advantage of the opportunity shall not create an inference that the opportunity should have been first presented to the corporation or alter the burden of proof otherwise applicable to establish that the director breached a duty to the corporation in the circumstances.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 429, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

Qualified director defined, see § 79-4-1.43.

Director’s conflicting interest transaction defined, see § 79-4-8.60.

Director’s conflict of interest under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-269.

Fifty-percent shareholder in a company and related parties did not breach their corporate fiduciary duties to company and divert certain corporate opportunities of company because company was completely dysfunctional due to a stalemate with the other shareholder and could not take advantage of opportunities that were allegedly usurped or diverted. Mandrella v. East (In re East Sys.), 2012 Bankr. LEXIS 5929 (Bankr. N.D. Miss. Dec. 28, 2012).